District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.09

Enforcement by civil action.

(a)

A civil action may be maintained against any employer in a court of competent jurisdiction by one or more employees.

(b)

An employer who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable to the affected employee or employees for the remedies set forth in § 32-1231.07(c).

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 10, 61 DCR 11368